nb: Whisky-stil: Blandet malt; Fatstyrke; Enkelt fat; Single malt; Annet
es: Estilo de whisky: Malta mezclada; Fuerza de barril; Barril único; Malta única; Otros
cs: Styl whisky: Směsná sladová; V sudové síle; Jediný sud; Jednosladová; Jiné
ru: Стиль виски: Купажированный солод; Крепость бочки; Одиночная бочка; Односолодовый; Другой
fr: Style de whisky: Malt mélangé; Brut de fût; Fût unique; Malt unique; Autre
ro-RO: Tipul de whisky: Malț amestecat; Rezistența butoiului; Butoi unic; Single malt; Altele
hu: Whiskey stílusa: Kevert maláta; Párlaterősség; Egyetlen hordó; Egyetlen maláta; Egyéb
nl: Whiskystijl: Gemengde mout; Vatsterkte; Enkel vat; Single malt; Andere
en: Whiskey style: Blended malt; Cask strength; Single cask; Single malt; Other
lt-LT: Viskio stilius: „Blended malt“ (maišytas); „Cask strength“ (vandeniu neskiestas); „Single cask“ (vienoje statinėje brandintas); „Single malt“ (vieno salyklo); Kita
th: สไตล์วิสกี้: เบลนด์มอลต์; แคสต์สเตร็งธ์; ซิงเกิลแคสต์; ซิงเกิลมอลต์; อื่นๆ
ja: ウイスキーの種類: ブレンデッドモルト; カスクストレングス; シングルカスク; シングルモルト; その他
el: Στυλ ουίσκι: Μικτό βύνη; Αντοχή βαρελιού; Μονό βαρέλι; Single malt; Άλλο
sv: Whiskystil: Blended malt; Fatstyrka; Single cask; Single malt; Övrigt
zh-TW: 威士忌樣式: 混合麥芽; 原桶強度; 單桶; 單一麥芽; 其他
pt-BR: Estilo de uísque: Blended malt; Cask strength; Single cask; Single malt; Outro
vi: Phong cách rượu whisky: Mạch nha pha trộn; Không pha nước; Thùng đơn; Mạch nha đơn cất; Khác
ko: 위스키 스타일: 블렌디드 몰트; 캐스크 스트렝스; 싱글 캐스크; 싱글 몰트; 기타
fi: Viskin tyyli: Blended malt; Cask strength; Single cask; Single malt; Muu
bg-BG: Стил уиски: Смесен малц; Сила на бъчвата; Единична бъчва; Сингъл малц; Други
de: Whiskey-Stil: Blended Malt; Fassstärke; Einzelfass; Single Malt; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 威士忌款式: 混合麦芽; 原桶浓度; 单桶; 单一麦芽; 其他
sl-SI: Stil viskija: Mešani slad; Dodana samo voda; Iz enega soda; Enojni slad; Drugo
da: Whiskystil: Blandet malt; Fadstyrke; Enkelt fad; Single malt; Andet
hr-HR: Vrsta viskija: Miješani; Snaga bačve; Iz jedne bačve; Nemiješani; Ostalo
sk-SK: Typ whisky: Miešaný slad; Pevnosť suda; Single cask; Single malt; Iné
it: Stile di whisky: Malto miscelato; Cask strength; Botte singola; Malto singolo; Altro
tr: Viski Stili: Malt harman; Fıçı gücü; Tek fıçı; Tek malt; Diğer
pt-PT: Estilo de uísque: Malte misturado; Força da casta; Casta única; Malte único; Outro
pl: Styl whisky: Słód mieszany; Wytrzymałość beczki; Pojedyncza beczka; Single malt; Inne